California statutes. Public Resources Code
(f) It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce the illegal disposal of used oil and recycle and reclaim used oil to the greatest extent possible in order to recover valuable natural resources and to avoid damage to the environment and threats to public health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Short Title [48601. - 48601.]

48601.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Oil Recycling Enhancement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Definitions [48610. - 48625.]

48610.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48610.3.

“Board” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 1.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48610.5.

“Bulk oil” means oil sold and delivered in a single transaction in an amount greater than 55 gallons regardless of the size of the container or containers in which the oil is delivered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 822, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

48611.

“Container” means a drum, can, or other receptacle used primarily for storage or transportation of oil. “Container” does not mean the equipment in which oil is used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48612.

“Department” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48613.

“Fund” means the California Used Oil Recycling Fund created pursuant to Section 48653.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48614.

“Industrial generator” means an entity which buys and uses lubricating oil only for equipment owned or used by the entity. “Industrial generator” includes state or local governmental entities, as defined by Section 5902 of the Government Code. “Industrial generator” does not include motor carriers which have received oil for which a payment has not been made pursuant to Section 48650.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1101, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

48616.

“Industrial oil” includes, but is not limited to, any compressor, turbine, or bearing oil, hydraulic oil, metal-working oil, or refrigeration oil. Industrial oil does not include dielectric fluids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48617.

“Local government” has the same meaning as defined in Section 30109.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48618.

“Lubricating oil” includes, but is not limited to, any oil intended for use in an internal combustion engine crankcase, transmission, gearbox, or differential in an automobile, bus, truck, vessel, plane, train, heavy equipment, or other machinery powered by an internal combustion engine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48618.4.

“Mitigation” is the prevention of stormwater pollution from used oil and oil byproducts and the reduction or alleviation of the effect of stormwater pollution from used oil and oil byproducts by means of action taken on public property. Mitigation includes the installation of devices and implementation of practices that prevent used oil and oil byproducts from causing stormwater pollution. Mitigation does not include the cleanup or restoration of polluted areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 317, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

48619.

“Oil manufacturer” means the first person or entity in the state to take title to lubricating or industrial oil for sale, use, or transfer in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1101, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

48620.

“Recycled oil” means recycled oil, as defined in Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 880, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

48620.2.

(a) “Rerefined oil” means a lubricant base stock or oil base that has been derived from used oil and meets all the following criteria:

(1) Processed using a series of mechanical or chemical methods, or both, including at a minimum, but not limited to, vacuum distillation, followed by solvent refining or hydrotreating.

(2) Capable of meeting the Physical and Compositional Properties, in addition to the Contaminants and Toxicological Properties, as defined under the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) D6074-99 standard.

(3) Processed into a material that has a performance quality level suitable for use in
 a finished lubricant. 

(b) A producer of a rerefined base stock shall provide a purchaser of that base stock with information that certifies that the rerefined base stock is rerefined oil, as that term is defined by subdivision (a). Any rerefined base stock that does not comply with subdivision (a) shall not be sold as rerefined oil and is subject to all applicable hazard, personal protection, and risk communication requirements until subsequent testing demonstrates compliance with subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 353, Sec. 4.   (SB 546)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48620.5.

“Stormwater pollution” for purposes of mitigation does not include runoff at a specific facility even if there is no point source at the facility. This pollution is from used oil and oil byproducts, often mixed with other solid waste, and is typically dispersed by urban stormwater and marina or boating activities, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 317, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

48621.

“Used oil” means used oil, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code. Used oil does not include articles contaminated with de minimis quantities of used oil, such as used oil filters, oily rags, and scrap metal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48622.

“Used oil collection center” means a business, governmental entity, or nonprofit organization which accepts used lubricating oil from the public and which is exempt from hazardous waste facility permit requirements pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25250.11 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48623.

“Used oil hauler” means a hazardous waste transporter registered pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code who transports used oil to a used oil recycling facility that is certified or registered with the board pursuant to Section 48662, to a used oil storage facility, or to a used oil transfer facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48624.

“Used oil recycling facility” means a facility that is issued a hazardous waste facilities permit or grant of interim status by the department pursuant to Section 25200 or 25200.5 of the Health and Safety Code to convert used oil into recycled oil, or an out-of-state facility operating in substantial compliance with Part 279 (commencing with Section 279.1) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations for the purpose of recycling used oil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 3.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48625.

The following terms have the following meaning:

(a) “Used oil storage facility” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Used oil transfer facility” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1147, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Used Oil Recycling [48630. - 48632.]

48630.

On or before October 1, 1992, the board shall adopt a used oil recycling program which promotes and develops alternatives to the illegal disposal of used oil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48631.

The used oil recycling program shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A recycling incentive system as described in Article 6 (commencing with Section 48650).

(b) Public and private grants and contracts, including, but not limited to, those between the board and local governments, nonprofit entities, and private entities for the purposes specified in Section 48632.

(c) Development and implementation of an information and education program to promote safe and proper used oil collection and treatment methods, methods to reduce used oil generation, and advances in new and existing technologies,
 including, but not limited to, use of rerefined oil in automotive and industrial lubricants.

(d) A reporting, monitoring, and enforcement program to ensure that all statutes and regulations relating to used oil are properly carried out.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 353, Sec. 6.   (SB 546)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48632.

The Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery may, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48631, issue grants to or contract with local governments, nonprofit entities, and private entities, for any of the following purposes:

(a) Providing and maintaining collection and recycling opportunities for used lubricating oil and filters that are in addition to those included in the local used oil collection programs adopted pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 48690).

(b) Research, testing, and demonstration projects for in-service uses, collection technologies, and end-of-life used oil management.

(c) Developing uses and markets for low environmental impact products resulting from the recycling of used oil, including, but not limited to, promoting the manufacture of rerefined lubricating oil.

(d) Product advancements and developments in lubricating oil resulting from, but not limited to, new requirements or technologies in fuel efficiency and performance, synthetic or biobased lubricants, alternative fuels, and methods to extend lubricating oil life.

(e) Education and mitigation projects relating to stormwater pollution from used oil and its impacts on receiving waters, soils, and oceans.

(f) A local government shall not receive a grant or contract pursuant to this section for any purpose identified in subdivision (e) unless the local government certifies that it has a stormwater management
 program that is approved by the appropriate California regional water quality control board and that the project approved for funding under subdivision (e) is consistent with that approved stormwater management program.

(g) An information and education program pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 48631.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 4.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Administration [48640. - 48645.]

48640.

The board shall administer this chapter. For organizational purposes, the board may create a new division, bureau, office, or unit to administer this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48641.

In addition to any other regulations which the board is required by statute to adopt, the board may adopt any other rules and regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code which the board determines may be necessary or useful to carry out this chapter or any of the board’s duties or responsibilities imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48642.

The board may prepare, publish, or issue printed pamphlets, which the board determines to be necessary, for the dissemination of information concerning the activities of the board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48643.

In carrying out this chapter, the board may solicit and use any and all expertise available in other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the State Board of Equalization, and, where an existing state agency performs functions of a similar nature to the board’s functions, the board may contract with or cooperate with that agency in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48644.

The board shall maintain access to a toll-free telephone number which is to be used for the purpose of informing callers of the following:

(a) The permissible methods of recycling or disposing of used oil.

(b) Specific establishments located in the area of the caller that have notified the board that they accept used oil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1147, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

48645.

Except for payments made to local governments pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 48653, final approval of applicant and project eligibility standards, scoring and evaluation processes, and awarding of grants under this chapter shall be made in a public meeting of, and pursuant to a vote of, the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 353, Sec. 10.   (SB 546)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Financial Provisions [48650. - 48657.]

48650.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), every oil manufacturer shall pay to the board, on or before the last day of the month following each quarter, an amount equal to six and one-half cents ($0.065) for every quart, or twenty-six cents ($0.26) for every gallon, of lubricating oil sold or transferred in the state, or imported into the state for use in the state in that quarter. For lubricating oil sold by weight, a weight to volume conversion factor of 7.5 pounds per gallon shall be used to determine the fee. Except as provided in subdivision (b), no payment is required for oil that meets any of the following:

(1) Oil for which a payment has already been made to the board pursuant to this section.

(2) Oil exported or sold for export from the state.

(3) Oil sold for use in vessels operated in interstate or foreign commerce.

(4) Oil imported into the state in the engine crankcase, transmission, gear box, or differential of an automobile, bus, truck, vessel, plane, train, or heavy equipment or machinery.

(5) Bulk oil imported into, transferred in, or sold in the state to a motor carrier, as defined in Section 408 of the Vehicle Code, and used in a vehicle designated in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 34500 of the Vehicle Code.

(6) The oil otherwise subject to payment pursuant to this subdivision has a volume of five gallons or less.

(b) If oil exempted from payment pursuant to subdivision (a) is subsequently sold or transferred for use, or is used, in this state, and the use does not qualify for exemption pursuant to subdivision (a), the entity that sells, transfers, or uses the oil for a purpose that is not exempt from payment, shall make the payment specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Every manufacturer of finished lubricant containing at least 70 percent rerefined base lubricant shall pay to the board an amount equal to three cents ($0.03) for every quart or twelve cents ($0.12) for every gallon sold or transferred in the state or imported into the state, pursuant to the schedule established in subdivision (a).

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (c), on and after January 1, 2014, every oil manufacturer shall pay to the board an amount equal to six cents ($0.06) for every quart or twenty-four
 cents ($0.24) for every gallon of lubricating oil sold or transferred in the state or imported into the state, pursuant to the schedule established in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 353, Sec. 11.   (SB 546)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48650.2.

For the purposes of this chapter, the board may collect the fees pursuant to the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1101, Sec. 6.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

48650.5.

(a) Any person who has made a payment pursuant to Section 48650 on lubricating oil exempted from payment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48650, and the payment was made either directly to the board, or indirectly to a vendor from whom it was purchased, by the adding of the amount of the payment to the price of the lubricating oil, shall be reimbursed and repaid the amount of the payment made on that oil, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(b) The claimant of a refund shall present to the board a claim supported by the original invoice showing the purchase. The claim shall state the total amount of the lubricating oil purchased by the claimant and the manner and the equipment in which the claimant has used the lubricating oil. The claim shall not be under oath but shall contain, or be accompanied by, a written declaration that it is made under the penalty of perjury.

(c) The board, upon the presentation of the claim and the invoice, shall pay the claimant from the payments collected under Section 48650 an amount equal to the payments collected on the lubricating oil in respect to which the refund is claimed.

(d) Any person who willfully makes or subscribes to a claim for refund under this section which the person does not believe to be true and correct as to every material matter is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be subject to the penalties prescribed for perjury by the Penal Code. All applications for refund under this section based upon the exportation of lubricating oil from this state shall be filed with the board within the three months after the close of the calendar month in which the lubricating oil is exported or 13 months from the date of the purchase of the lubricating oil, whichever is later. Any application filed after the prescribed time shall not be considered by the board or any other agency or officer of the state for any purpose.

(e) In lieu of the collection and refund of the payment on lubricating oil used by a manufacturer in a manner that entitles a purchaser to claim a refund under this section, the board may give a credit to the manufacturer upon the filing of a return and the determination of the amount of the fee.

(f) In lieu of the collection and refund of the payment on lubricating oil exported by a licensed manufacturer for use outside the state in a manner that entitles a manufacturer to claim a refund pursuant to this section, the board may give a credit to the distributor upon his or her payment return and the determination of the amount of his or her payment, in accordance with such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe.

(g) When an amount represented by a person to a customer as constituting reimbursement for fees due under this chapter is computed upon an amount that is not subject to that fee, or is in excess of that fee amount due, and is actually paid by the customer to the person, the amount so paid shall be returned by the person to the customer, upon notification by the board or by the customer that the excess has been ascertained. If the person fails or refuses to return that amount, the person shall remit to the board the amount so paid, if the amount was knowingly or mistakenly computed by the person upon an amount that is not subject to the fee, or is in excess of the fee due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 822, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

48650.7.

In any transaction involving a total volume of oil subject to payment pursuant to Section 48650 in excess of 10 gallons, the invoice or other form of accounting of the transaction shall identify the amount of the payment separately from the cost of the oil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1101, Sec. 9.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

48651.

The board shall pay a recycling incentive pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48652 to every industrial generator, curbside collection program, and certified used oil collection center, for used lubricating oil collected from the public or generated by the certified used oil collection center or the industrial generator, if either of the following conditions apply:

(a) The used lubricating oil is transported by a used oil hauler to a used oil storage facility or to a used oil transfer facility and that used oil storage facility or used oil transfer facility causes that oil to be transported by a used oil hauler to an in-state used oil recycling facility that is certified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48662 or to an out-of-state used
 oil recycling facility registered pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48662 or certified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 48662 for the purpose of producing recycled oil as defined in Section 48620.

(b) The used lubricating oil is transported by a used oil hauler directly to an in-state used oil recycling facility that is certified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48662, or to an out-of-state used oil recycling facility registered pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48662 or certified pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 48662, for the purpose of producing recycled oil, as defined in Section 48620.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 5.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48651.5.

(a) Effective January 1, 2013, the board, with regard to promoting the recycling of used lubricating oil into rerefined oil, shall pay a rerefining incentive pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48652 to a recycling facility for rerefined oil produced from used oil if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The facility is an in-state or out-of-state recycling facility that is certified in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 48662 and produces rerefined base lubricant meeting the specifications of rerefined oil, as defined in Section 48620.2.

(2) The used oil was generated and collected within the state and prior to treatment or processing has
 been tested to meet the definition of used oil, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The facility submits to the board a completed used oil rerefining incentive payment claim in the form and manner that the board may prescribe.

(b) (1) To further promote the safe management of used oil, and to review the changes in policy and program enacted by the Legislature by Chapter 353 of the Statutes of 2009, without implying that any further changes are necessary and warranted, the board, using existing financial resources, shall do all of the following:

(A) Contract with a third-party consultant with recognized expertise in life-cycle assessments to coordinate a comprehensive life-cycle analysis of the used lubricating and industrial oil
 management process, from generation through collection, transportation, and reuse alternatives.

(B) Solicit input from representatives of all used oil stakeholders in defining the scope and design of the life-cycle analysis, in conducting the life-cycle analysis, and in issuing a draft report for public review and comment.

(C) Evaluate the positive and negative impacts of the testing requirements established in Section 25250.29 of the Health and Safety Code, the tiered fee on lubricating oil established in Section 48650, and the tiered incentive payments established in Section 48652, on used oil collection rates.

(D) On or before January 1, 2014, submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, describing the findings of the life-cycle analysis and the evaluation of the used
 oil management policies on used oil collection rates specified in subparagraph (C) and provide any recommendations for statutory changes that may be necessary to promote increased collection and responsible management of used oil.

(2) All costs incurred by the board and its contractors in meeting the requirements of this subdivision shall be covered by the additional one-half-cent ($0.005) fee established in subdivision (a) of Section 48650, and effective through December 31, 2013, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48650.

(c) The requirement for submitting a report pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is inoperative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 6.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48652.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the board shall set the recycling incentive at not less than ten cents ($0.10) per quart. The board may set the amount at an amount higher than ten cents ($0.10) if the board determines that a higher amount is necessary to promote the collection and recycling of used lubricating oil and sufficient funds are available in the fund.

(b) On and after January 1, 2013, the board shall set the rerefining incentive at not less than two cents ($0.02) per gallon. On and after January 1, 2015, the board may set the rerefining incentive at a higher amount if the board determines that a higher amount is necessary to promote rerefining of used lubricating oil and sufficient funds are available
 in the fund.

(c) The board shall not change the amount of an incentive paid pursuant to this section until at least one year has passed since the amount was last set. The amount of an incentive paid by the board shall remain at the previous amount for one month after setting the incentive at a different amount. The board shall not raise the amount of an incentive paid unless it finds that the raise will not adversely affect funding required pursuant to Sections 48631, 48653, and 48660.5.

(d) The board shall set the recycling incentive for used oil generated by a certified used oil collection center and an industrial generator at not less than four cents ($0.04) per quart. The board may set the amount higher than four cents ($0.04), if the board determines that a higher amount is necessary to promote the collection and recycling of used lubricating oil from these generators and
 sufficient funds are available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 7.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48653.

The board shall deposit all amounts paid pursuant to Section 48650 by manufacturers, civil penalties, and fines paid pursuant to this chapter, and all other revenues received pursuant to this chapter into the California Used Oil Recycling Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the fund is to be appropriated solely as follows:

(a) Continuously appropriated to the board for expenditure for the following purposes:

(1) To pay recycling incentives pursuant to Section 48651.

(2) To provide a reserve for contingencies, as may be available after making other payments required by this
 section, in an amount not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(3) (A) To make payments for the implementation of local used oil collection programs adopted pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 48690) to cities, based on the city’s population, and counties, based on the population of the unincorporated area of the county. Payment shall be determined by multiplying the total annual amount by the fraction equal to the population of cities and counties that are eligible for payments pursuant to Section 48690, divided by the population of the state. The board shall use the latest population estimates of the state generated by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance in making the calculations required by this paragraph. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 48656, the total annual amount shall equal eleven million dollars ($11,000,000), subject to subparagraph (B).

(B) If sufficient funds are not available to initially issue full funding pursuant to subparagraph (A), the board shall provide funding as follows:

(i) For the purposes set forth in this paragraph, one-half of the amount that remains in the fund after the expenditures are made pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) and subdivision (b). The board may utilize additional amounts from the fund, up to, but not exceeding, eleven million dollars ($11,000,000).

(ii) As the board finds is fiscally appropriate, for the purposes set forth in Section 48656. The board shall give priority to the distribution of funding in clause (i) for the purposes of this paragraph.

(C) Pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 48691, it is the intent of this paragraph that
 at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) be made available specifically for used oil filter collection and recycling programs.

(4) To implement Section 48660.5, in an amount not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) annually.

(5) For expenditures pursuant to Section 48656.

(b) The money in the fund may be expended by the board for the administration of this chapter and by the department for inspections and reports pursuant to Section 48661, only upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the money in the fund may be transferred to the Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Account in the General Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature in
 the annual Budget Act, to pay the costs associated with implementing and operating the Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 48100).

(2) The money in the fund attributable to a charge increase or adjustment made or authorized in an amendment to subdivision (a) of Section 48650 by the act adding this paragraph shall not be transferred to the Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Account.

(d) The money in the fund may be expended by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, upon appropriation by the Legislature, pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of, and paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of, Section 17001.

(e) Appropriations to the board to pay the costs necessary to administer this chapter shall not
 exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000) annually.

(f) The Legislature hereby finds and declares its intent that three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) should be annually appropriated from the California Used Oil Recycling Fund in the annual Budget Act to the board, commencing with fiscal year 2010–11, for the purposes of Section 48655 and to conduct those investigations and enforcement actions necessary to ensure a used oil storage facility or used oil transfer facility causes the used lubricating oil to be transported, as required by subdivision (a) of Section 48651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 130.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48655.

The board may enter into a contract with the department that will utilize the resources of the department to provide for greater investigation and enforcement efforts for used lubricating oil handling and storage and transfer facility operations. The department shall assist the board in developing the used oil program and providing assistance to local governments in removing barriers to the establishment of used oil collection programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 822, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

48656.

After all of the expenditures pursuant to Section 48653 have been made, notwithstanding paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 48653, the balance remaining in the fund shall be available to the board for the following purposes:

(a) The implementation of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 48631 and Section 48651.5, subject to both of the following requirements:

(1) The allocation of funds to implement subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 48631 shall be at the discretion of the board to be determined annually in a public meeting and pursuant to a vote of the board.

(2) The board shall pay rerefining incentives
 pursuant to Section 48651.5 if sufficient funds are available in the fund.

(b) Annual revenues left unspent in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be allocated pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 48653 for local collection programs adopted pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 48690).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 353, Sec. 17.   (SB 546)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48657.

The board shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, and these books, records, and accounts, and any amounts paid into or from the fund, are subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the board. The auditing firm or the board shall also conduct a selective audit of entities making payments to, or receiving payments from, the board to determine whether payments required by Section 48650 are being paid to the board on all lubricating oil sold in California, and that grants and recycling incentives are being paid out properly by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 38.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Certification [48660. - 48662.]

48660.

(a) No used oil collection center shall be eligible for the payment of recycling incentives until the board has certified that the center is in compliance with the requirements in subdivision (b). Before certification, the board may require the center to submit any information that the board determines is necessary to find that the center is in compliance with those requirements. A center shall reapply for certification every four years. The board may cancel the certification of a center if the board finds that the center is not, or has not been, in compliance with subdivision (b). The board may withhold the payment of recycling incentives for used lubricating oil collected by a center if the board finds that the center was not in compliance with subdivision (b) during the time in which
 the used lubricating oil was collected.

(b) To be eligible for certification by the board and for the payment of recycling incentives, the used oil collection center shall do all of the following:

(1) Accept used lubricating oil from the public at no charge during the hours that the entity operating as the center is open for business.

(2) Pay to a person, at his or her request, an amount equal to the recycling incentive that the center will receive for used lubricating oil brought to the center in containers by the person. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person from donating used lubricating oil to a center. The recycling incentive may be in the form of a credit that may be applied toward the purchase of goods or services offered by the center, as determined by the board. The credit shall be in the form of a
 voucher or coupon with a value of at least twice the incentive amount to be paid pursuant to Section 48652 and have no other limits for use, unless prescribed by the board.

(3) Provide information to the board for informing the public of the center’s acceptance of used lubricating oil.

(4) Provide notice to the public of the center’s acceptance of used lubricating oil from the public through periodic advertising in local media and onsite signs that meet the following requirements:

(A) Onsite signs shall be of a design and specification prescribed by the board and shall state that the center is certified by the state and collects used oil from the public at no charge.

(B) A certified center shall post an exterior sign of a design and specification
 prescribed by the board in a location that is easily visible from a public street. In addition, the certified center shall post an informational sign of a design and specification prescribed by the board so that it is easily readable from the location where the used oil is received from the public.

(C) If local zoning ordinances prevent signs of a size consistent with this paragraph, the exterior symbolic sign shall be of the maximum allowable size.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a used oil collection center may refuse to accept used lubricating oil that has been contaminated in a manner other than that which would occur through normal use.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a used oil collection center shall not knowingly accept used lubricating oil for which a payment has not been made pursuant to Section
 48650.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 353, Sec. 18.   (SB 546)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48660.5.

(a) If the board finds that a shipment of used oil from a certified used oil collection center, curbside collection program, or uncertified publicly funded used oil collection center in a small rural county is contaminated by hazardous materials in excess of that which generally occurs in normal use, which renders the used oil infeasible for recycling, and requires that the used oil be destroyed at a substantially higher cost than the cost generally to recycle used oil, the board shall, upon application by the used oil collection center or curbside collection program, reimburse the center or program for the additional disposal cost, subject to the eligibility requirements of subdivision (b), except as provided in subdivision (c).

(b) A certified used oil collection center, curbside collection program, or uncertified publicly funded used oil collection center in a small rural county is eligible for reimbursement only if it demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board all of the following, except that paragraph (1) does not apply to an uncertified publicly funded used oil collection center in a small rural county:

(1) The center or program has established procedures to ensure that the used oil it generates and accepts from the public will not be mixed with other hazardous wastes, especially halogen-contaminated and polychlorinated biphenyl-contaminated wastes. These procedures shall include, but not be limited to, instructing the public and employees that used oil shall not be mixed with other hazardous waste. The board shall not require a center or program to test used oil received from the public as part of these procedures.
